Hawaii statutes.
§121‑34.5 Use of electric
guns. Members of the army or air national guard who have been qualified by
training and are authorized by their commanders may use electric guns, as
specifically provided in section 134-16(c) and (d), when assisting civil authorities
in disaster relief, emergency management, or law enforcement functions;
provided that "training" for the purposes of this section means a
course of instruction or training in the use of any electric gun authorized
pursuant to this section, that is provided or authorized by the manufacturer or
is manufacturer-approved or is an electric gun training program approved by the
army or air national guard, prior to deployment or issuance of electric guns
and related equipment. [L 2011, c 144, §2; am L 2014, c 111, §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next